Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-509
Property, defined.

Wherever the term property is used in sections 46-501 to 46-573, it shall, unless otherwise specified, be held to mean real estate and personal property.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 2(7), p. 525.